Maryland, session 2025, HB1346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–926.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “CREATIVE EXPRESSION” MEANS THE
EXPRESSION OR APPLICATION OF CREATIVITY OR IMAGINATION IN THE
PRODUCTION OR ARRANGEMENT OF FORMS, SOUNDS, WORDS, MOVEMENTS, OR
SYMBOLS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1346*

HOUSE BILL 1346
(2) “CREATIVE EXPRESSION” INCLUDES:
(I) MUSIC;
(II) DANCE;
(III) PERFORMANCE ART;
(IV) VISUAL ART;
(V) POETRY;
(VI) LITERATURE; AND
(VII) FILM.
(B) IN ANY CRIMINAL PROCEEDING OR JUVENILE PROCEEDING, THE
CREATIVE EXPRESSION OF A DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT IS NOT ADMISSIBLE
AGAINST THE DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT UNLESS THE COURT FINDS, BY CLEAR
AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE, THAT:
(1) (I) THE DEFENDANT OR RESPONDENT INTENDED THE
CREATIVE EXPRESSION TO BE LITERAL, RATHER THAN FIGURATIVE OR FICTIONAL;
OR
(II) IF THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION IS DERIVATIVE, THE
DEFENDANT INTENDED TO ADOPT THE LITERAL MEANING OF THE CREATIVE
EXPRESSION AS THEIR OWN;
(2) THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION REFERS TO THE SPECIFIC FACTS OF
THE ALLEGED OFFENSE;
(3) THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION IS RELEVANT TO A DISPUTED ISSUE
OF FACT; AND
(4) THE CREATIVE EXPRESSION HAS PROBATIVE VALUE THAT
CANNOT BE PROVIDED BY OTHER ADMISSIBLE EVIDENCE.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PRECLUDES THE ADMISSION OF CREATIVE
EXPRESSION IN JUVENILE CASES FOR THE PURPOSES OF EVALUATING,
RECOMMENDING, OR ORDERING REFERRAL TO MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES OR
DIVERSION PROGRAMS.

HOUSE BILL 1346 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.